shared/misc/czech/czech_unaccent.affix
SFX Z Y 133
SFX Z   a           i          [aeiouyzscrj]a
SFX Z   a           i          [^srn]ca
SFX Z   ca          ky         [srn]ca
SFX Z   da          di         da
SFX Z   na          ni         na
SFX Z   ta          ti         ta
SFX Z   a           y          [^aeiouyzscrcjdtn]a
SFX Z   a           e          [bdfmnptvw]a
SFX Z   da          de         da
SFX Z   na          ne         na
SFX Z   ta          te         ta
SFX Z   ga          ze         ga
SFX Z   cha         se         cha
SFX Z   ha          ze         [^c]ha
SFX Z   ka          ce         ka
SFX Z   ra          re         [^r]ra
SFX Z   rra         re         rra
SFX Z   a           e          [^bdfmnptvwdtnghkr]a
SFX Z   a           u          a
SFX Z   a           o          a
SFX Z   a           ou         a
SFX Z   a           y          ea
SFX Z   a           i          [aeiouy]a
SFX Z   a           am         a
SFX Z   a           ach        a
SFX Z   0           mi         a
SFX Z   y           am         [^a]y
SFX Z   y           ach        [^a]y
SFX Z   y           ami        [^a]y
SFX Z   0           e          ay
SFX Z   0           i          ay
SFX Z   0           i          ay
SFX Z   0           im         ay
SFX Z   0           ich        ay
SFX Z   0           emi        ay
SFX Z   s           da         s
SFX Z   s           dy         s
SFX Z   s           de         s
SFX Z   s           du         s
SFX Z   s           do         s
SFX Z   s           dou        s
SFX Z   s           dam        s
SFX Z   s           dach       s
SFX Z   s           dami       s
SFX Z   e           i          [^g]e
SFX Z   e           i          [^g]e
SFX Z   e           im         [^g]e
SFX Z   e           ich        [^g]e
SFX Z   0           mi         [^g]e
SFX Z   e           i          e
SFX Z   e           i          e
SFX Z   e           im         e
SFX Z   e           ich        e
SFX Z   0           mi         e
SFX Z   ge          zi         dge
SFX Z   ge          zi         dge
SFX Z   ge          zim        dge
SFX Z   ge          zich       dge
SFX Z   ge          zemi       dge
SFX Z   en          ne         [^aeioye]sen
SFX Z   en          ni         [^aeioye]sen
SFX Z   en          ni         [^aeioye]sen
SFX Z   en          nim        [^aeioye]sen
SFX Z   en          nich       [^aeioye]sen
SFX Z   en          nemi       [^aeioye]sen
SFX Z   n           ne         [aeioye]sen
SFX Z   n           ni         [aeioye]sen
SFX Z   n           ni         [aeioye]sen
SFX Z   n           nim        [aeioye]sen
SFX Z   n           nich       [aeioye]sen
SFX Z   n           nemi       [aeioye]sen
SFX Z   en          ne         [^lrs]en
SFX Z   en          ni         [^lrs]en
SFX Z   en          ni         [^lrs]en
SFX Z   en          nim        [^lrs]en
SFX Z   en          nich       [^lrs]en
SFX Z   en          nemi       [^lrs]en
SFX Z   n           ne         [lr]en
SFX Z   n           ni         [lr]en
SFX Z   n           ni         [lr]en
SFX Z   n           nim        [lr]en
SFX Z   n           nich       [lr]en
SFX Z   n           nemi       [lr]en
SFX Z   ev          ve         ev
SFX Z   ev          vi         ev
SFX Z   ev          vi         ev
SFX Z   ev          vim        ev
SFX Z   ev          vich       ev
SFX Z   ev          vemi       ev
SFX Z   ec          ce         [^lp]ec
SFX Z   ec          ci         [^lp]ec
SFX Z   ec          ci         [^lp]ec
SFX Z   ec          cim        [^lp]ec
SFX Z   ec          cich       [^lp]ec
SFX Z   ec          cemi       [^lp]ec
SFX Z   0           e          [lp]ec
SFX Z   0           i          [lp]ec
SFX Z   0           i          [lp]ec
SFX Z   0           im         [lp]ec
SFX Z   0           ich        [lp]ec
SFX Z   0           emi        [lp]ec
SFX Z   0           e          [jlptxzcsrz]
SFX Z   0           i          [jlmptxzcsrz]
SFX Z   0           i          [jlmptxzcsrz]
SFX Z   0           im         [jlmptxzcsrz]
SFX Z   0           ich        [jlmptxzcsrz]
SFX Z   0           emi        [jlmptxzcsrz]
SFX Z   0           e          em
SFX Z   0           emi        em
SFX Z   0           e          [^e][cmv]
SFX Z   0           i          [^e][cv]
SFX Z   0           i          [^e][cv]
SFX Z   0           im         [^e][cv]
SFX Z   0           ich        [^e][cv]
SFX Z   0           emi        [^e][cv]
SFX Z   n           ne         [^e]n
SFX Z   n           ni         [^e]n
SFX Z   n           ni         [^e]n
SFX Z   n           nim        [^e]n
SFX Z   n           nich       [^e]n
SFX Z   n           nemi       [^e]n
SFX Z   t           te         t
SFX Z   t           ti         t
SFX Z   t           ti         t
SFX Z   t           tim        t
SFX Z   t           tich       t
SFX Z   t           temi       t
SFX Z   d           de         d
SFX Z   d           di         d
SFX Z   d           di         d
SFX Z   d           dim        d
SFX Z   d           dich       d
SFX Z   d           demi       d
